Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 102
INCORPORATION

Cross references:

(1) For definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-101-401.

(2) For recording certificates of incorporation and other recording requirements, see §§ 38-30-144 and 38-35-109.

Law reviews:

For article, "

C

hoice of Entities in

C

olorado", see 23 Colo. Law. 293 (1994); for article, "Choice of Entity in Colorado: An Update", see 25 Colo. Law. 3 (Oct. 1996).

Section

7-102-101. Incorporators.

One or more persons may act as the incorporator or incorporators of a corporation by delivering articles of incorporation to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title. An incorporator who is an individual shall be of the age of eighteen years or older.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 742, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1846, § 104, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1711, § 103, effective October 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1496, § 247, effective July 1.

7-102-102. Articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation shall state:

The domestic entity name for the corporation, which domestic entity name shall comply with part 6 of article 90 of this title;

The information regarding shares required by section 7-106-101;

The registered agent name and registered agent address of the corporation's initial registered agent;

The principal office address of the corporation's initial principal office;

The true name and mailing address of each incorporator.

Repealed.

The articles of incorporation may, but need not, state:

The names and addresses of the individuals who are elected to serve as the initial directors;

Provisions not inconsistent with law regarding:

The purpose or purposes for which the corporation is incorporated;

Managing the business of the corporation and regulating its affairs;

Defining, limiting, and regulating the powers of the corporation, its board of directors, and its shareholders;

A par value for authorized shares or classes of shares;

The imposition of personal liability on shareholders for the debts of the corporation to a stated extent and upon stated conditions;

Any provision that under articles 101 to 117 of this title is required or permitted to be stated in the bylaws;

A provision eliminating or limiting the liability of a director to the corporation or its shareholders for money damages for any action taken, or any failure to take any action, as a director, except liability for:

The amount of a financial benefit received by a director to which the director is not entitled;

An intentional infliction of harm on the corporation or the shareholders;

A violation of section 7-108-405; or

An intentional violation of criminal law; and

A provision limiting or eliminating a duty of a director or any other person to offer the corporation the right to have or participate in any, or one or more classes or categories of, business opportunities, before the pursuit or taking of the opportunity by the director or other person if any application of the provision to an officer or a related person of that officer:

Requires a determination by the board of directors by action of the disinterested directors taken in compliance with the procedures set forth in section 7-108-402 after the effective date of the provision applying the provision to a particular officer or any related person of that officer; and

May be limited by the authorizing action of the board.

For corporations incorporated after December 31, 1958, if cumulative voting is not desired in the election of directors, a statement to that effect shall be made in the articles of incorporation. If no such statement is made, cumulative voting shall be mandatory in the election of directors, subject to the provisions of section 7-107-209. For corporations incorporated before January 1, 1959, the articles of incorporation shall state whether cumulative voting shall be allowed in the election of directors; and, if the articles of incorporation allow cumulative voting, shareholders shall be permitted to cumulate their shares in the election of directors as provided in section 7-107-209.

The articles of incorporation need not state any of the corporate powers enumerated in articles 101 to 117 of this title.

If articles 101 to 117 of this title condition any matter upon the presence of a provision in the bylaws, the condition is satisfied if such provision is present either in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. If articles 101 to 117 of this title condition any matter upon the absence of a provision in the bylaws, the condition is satisfied only if the provision is absent from both the articles of incorporation and the bylaws.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 743, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) amended, p. 977, § 51, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(f) repealed, p. 1846, § 105, effective July 1; (1)(f) repealed, p. 1711, § 104, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(c), (1)(d), IP(2), (2)(b)(V), (2)(c), and (4) amended, p. 2314, § 220, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(e) and (2)(a) amended, p. 1496, § 248, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2)(a) amended, p. 879, § 68, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(e) amended, p. 24, § 18, effective August 5.

L. 2019:

(2)(b)(V) amended and (2)(d) and (2)(e) added, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1925, § 28, effective July 1, 2020.

7-102-103. Incorporation.

A corporation is incorporated when the articles of incorporation are filed by the secretary of state or, if a delayed effective date is stated pursuant to section 7-90-304 in the articles of incorporation as filed by the secretary of state and if a statement of change revoking the articles of incorporation is not filed before such effective date, on such delayed effective date. The corporate existence begins upon incorporation.

The secretary of state's filing of the articles of incorporation is conclusive that all conditions precedent to incorporation have been met.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 744, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1312, § 8, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1859, § 157, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1711, § 105, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2314, § 221, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1496, § 249, effective July 1.

7-102-104. Unauthorized assumption of corporate powers.

All persons purporting to act as or on behalf of a corporation without authority to do so and without good faith belief that they have such authority shall be jointly and severally liable for all liabilities incurred or arising as a result thereof.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 744, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-102-105. Organization of corporation.

After incorporation:

If initial directors are not elected in the articles of incorporation, the incorporators may hold a meeting, at the call of a majority of the incorporators, to adopt initial bylaws, if desired, and to elect a board of directors; and

The initial directors may hold a meeting, at the call of a majority of the directors, to adopt bylaws, if desired, to appoint officers, and to carry on any other business.

Action required or permitted by articles 101 to 117 of this title to be taken by incorporators at an organizational meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action is taken in the manner provided in section 7-108-202 for action by directors without a meeting.

An organizational meeting may be held in or out of this state.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 744, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-102-106. Bylaws.

The board of directors or, if no directors have been elected, the incorporators may adopt initial bylaws. If neither the incorporators nor the board of directors have adopted initial bylaws, the shareholders may do so.

The bylaws of a corporation may contain any provision for managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation that is not inconsistent with law or with the articles of incorporation.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 745, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-102-107. Emergency bylaws.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, the board of directors may adopt bylaws to be effective only in an emergency as defined in subsection (4) of this section. The emergency bylaws, which are subject to amendment or repeal by the shareholders, may include all provisions necessary for managing the corporation during the emergency, including:

Procedures for calling a meeting of the board of directors;

Quorum requirements for the meeting; and

Designation of additional or substitute directors.

All provisions of the regular bylaws consistent with the emergency bylaws shall remain in effect during the emergency. The emergency bylaws shall not be effective after the emergency ends.

Corporate action taken in good faith in accordance with the emergency bylaws:

Binds the corporation; and

May not be the basis for imposition of liability on any director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation on the ground that the action was not authorized corporate action.

An emergency exists for the purposes of this section if a quorum of the directors cannot readily be obtained because of some catastrophic event.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 745, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-102-108. Forum selection - definition.

The articles of incorporation or the bylaws may require that any or all internal corporate claims must be brought exclusively in any specified court of this state and, if so specified, in any additional courts in this state or in any other jurisdiction with which the corporation has a reasonable relationship.

A provision of the articles of incorporation or bylaws specified in subsection (1) of this section does not confer jurisdiction on any court or over any person or claim and does not apply if none of the courts specified by the provision has the requisite personal and subject-matter jurisdiction. If a court specified in a provision specified in subsection (1) of this section does not have the requisite personal and subject-matter jurisdiction and another court of this state does have that jurisdiction, the internal corporate claim may be brought:

In the other court of this state, notwithstanding that the other court is not specified in the provision; and

In any other court specified in the provision that has the requisite jurisdiction.

No provision of the articles of incorporation or the bylaws may prohibit bringing an internal corporate claim in the courts of this state or require the claims to be determined by arbitration.

"Internal corporate claim" means:

Any claim that is based upon a violation of a duty under the laws of this state by a current or former director, officer, or shareholder in that capacity;

A derivative action or proceeding brought on behalf of the corporation;

An action asserting a claim arising pursuant to any provision of articles 101 to 117 of this title 7, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws; or

An action asserting a claim governed by the internal affairs doctrine that is not included in subsections (4)(a) to (4)(c) of this section.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1926, § 29, effective July 1, 2020.